Louisiana, session 2026, SB12.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 11:1301, 1305(B), 1307.1(B)(2), 1310(A)(1) and (2)(a), 1333, 1334,
and 1345.2(1) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1301. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following terms have these meanings:
(1) "Board" means the Louisiana State Police Retirement System Board.
(2) "Commission" means the State Police Commission as established by
Article X, Section 43 of the Constitution of Louisiana.
(2)(3) "Distributee" means a person who is eligible for benefits pursuant to
this Chapter.
(3)(4) "Division" or "office" means the office of state police, Department of
Public Safety.
(4)(5) "Fund" means the Louisiana State Police Retirement System Fund.
(5)(6) "Minor Child" means a child of a member of this system who is under
the age of eighteen years or who is a student who is under the age of twenty-three
Page 1 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 12 ENROLLED
years.
(6)(7) "Pension plan" means the defined benefit plan created by this Chapter
and administered by the board to provide monthly benefits for retirees, beneficiaries,
and survivors.
(7)(8) "Student" means a person in a high school, a vocational-technical
school, or a college or university, in a sufficient number of courses and classes in an
accredited institution to be classified as a full-time regular student under the criteria
used by the institution in which he is enrolled.
(8)(9) "System" means the Louisiana State Police Retirement System.
(9)(10) "Vested" means that a benefit payable to the member at some future
time is not forfeitable.
* * *
§1305. Membership in pension and retirement system; credit for unclassified service
prohibited; exceptions
* * *
B. Except for the secretary and the deputy secretary of the Department of
Public Safety and Corrections who shall be unclassified state employees, all
members of the State Police Retirement System shall be classified employees under
the state civil service system commission and after July 27, 1966, no service credit
shall be allowed in the system for unclassified service with the office of state police
except for service as secretary and deputy secretary of the Department of Public
Safety and Corrections.
* * *
§1307.1. Exceptions
* * *
B.(1) * * *
(2)(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary and
specifically the provisions of R.S. 11:1310, the phrase "average salary" as used in
this Subsection for the purpose of computing the regular retirement benefits of any
member who entered the Deferred Retirement Option Plan based on less than
Page 2 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 12 ENROLLED
twenty-five years of service shall mean the average salary including any pay or
salary provided by the legislature in addition to that pay or salary that is set by either
the Civil Service Commission or the State Police Civil Service Commission
commission for any twelve-month period of service occurring while a member of
this system, but limited to the first twenty-five years of state trooper service,
regardless of whether such state trooper service occurred before, during, or after
participation in the Deferred Retirement Option Plan. The phrase "average salary"
as defined by this Subparagraph shall be used for purposes of computing the regular
retirement benefit that is payable based on all service occurring prior to the member's
effective date of participation in the Deferred Retirement Option Plan.
(b) Any supplemental regular retirement benefit which is payable based on
service which occurs after the member's termination of participation in the Deferred
Retirement Option Plan shall be based on the greater of the average salary as
determined in Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph or the average salary including any
pay or salary provided by the legislature in addition to that pay or salary that is set
by either the Civil Service Commission or the State Police Civil Service Commission
commission for any twelve-month period of service occurring while a member of
this system, but limited to the years of service which are attributable to twenty-five
or more years of state trooper service.
* * *
§1310. Average salary; method of determining
A.(1) With respect to persons employed prior to September 8, 1978, the term
"average salary" as used in this Chapter for the purpose of determining pension
payments and retirement is the average salary including any additional pay or salary
provided by the legislature over and above that set by the Civil Service Commission
commission, received for the year ending on the last day of the month immediately
preceding the date of retirement or date of death or for any one-year period,
whichever is the greatest. For the purposes of computation, "average salary" shall not
include overtime, expenses, or clothing allowances.
(2)(a) With respect to persons becoming employed on and after September
Page 3 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 12 ENROLLED
8, 1978, and whose first employment making them eligible for membership in one
of the state systems occurred on or before December 31, 2010, the term "average
salary" as used in this Chapter for the purpose of determining pension payments and
retirement is the average salary including any additional pay or salary provided by
the legislature over and above that set by the Civil Service Commission commission,
received for the thirty-six highest months of successive employment, or for the
highest thirty-six successive joined months of employment where interruption of
service occurred, whichever is the greatest. For the purposes of computation,
"average salary" shall not include overtime, expenses, or clothing allowances.
* * *
§1333. Accumulation of annual leave; conversion to membership service
A member shall be allowed to accumulate without limitation all of the
member's unused annual leave. When a member retires, or dies while still a member
of the fund and before retirement leaving a surviving spouse or dependent, or both,
who are entitled to benefits under this Chapter, his unused accumulated annual leave
which was earned under civil service the commission or administrative rules shall
be added to his membership service, the addition to membership service to be on the
basis of one work day for each eight hours of unused annual leave. Fractional days
of one-half day or more shall be counted as one day and fractional days of less than
one-half day shall be disregarded. The member's unused annual leave shall not be
used to determine eligibility for retirement, but shall be credited to the member only
after it is determined that the member is otherwise eligible for retirement.
§1334. Accumulation of sick leave; conversion to membership service
When a member retires, or dies while still a member and before retirement
leaving a surviving spouse or dependent, or both, who are entitled to benefits under
this Chapter, his unused accumulated sick leave which was earned under the civil
service commission or administrative rules shall be added to his membership
service, the addition to be on the basis of one work day for each eight hours of
unused sick leave. Fractional days of one-half day or more shall be counted as one
day but fractional days of less than one-half day shall be disregarded. The member's
Page 4 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 12 ENROLLED
unused accumulated sick leave shall not be used to determine eligibility for
retirement, but shall be credited to the member only after it is determined that the
member is otherwise eligible for retirement.
* * *
§1345.2. Application; definitions
Terms not specifically defined in this Section shall have the meanings
provided in R.S. 11:1301 unless a different meaning is clearly required by the
context. For purposes of this Part:
(1) "Average compensation" means the average annual earned compensation
of a member for the sixty highest months of successive employment, or for the
highest sixty successive joined months of employment where interruption of service
occurred; however, average compensation for part-time employees who do not use
sixty months of full-time employment for average compensation purposes shall be
based on the base pay the part-time employee would have received had he been
employed on a full-time basis. The earnings to be considered for the thirteenth
through the twenty-fourth month shall not exceed one hundred fifteen percent of the
earnings of the first through the twelfth month. The earnings to be considered for the
twenty-fifth through the thirty-sixth month shall not exceed one hundred fifteen
percent of the earnings of the thirteenth through the twenty-fourth month. The
earnings to be considered for the thirty-seventh through the forty-eighth month shall
not exceed one hundred fifteen percent of the earnings of the twenty-fifth through
the thirty-sixth month. The earnings for the final twelve months shall not exceed one
hundred fifteen percent of the earnings of the thirty-seventh through the forty-eighth
month. The limitations on the computation of average compensation contained in this
Paragraph shall not apply to any twelve-month period during which compensation
increased by more than fifteen percent over the previous twelve-month period solely
because of an increase in compensation by a uniform systemwide increase adopted
by the state Department of Civil Service commission and approved by the governor
or because of a pay adjustment enacted by the legislature.
* * *
Page 5 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 12 ENROLLED
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on June 30, 2026; if vetoed by the
governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on
the day following such approval by the legislature or June 30, 2026, whichever is later.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 6 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.